North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116B. Escheats and Abandoned Property.
Article 4. North Carolina Unclaimed Property Act.

§ 116B-51.
Short title.

This Article may be cited as the “North Carolina Unclaimed Property Act.”

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

Cross References.

Unclaimed life insurance benefits,

G.S. 58-58-360

et seq.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Unclaimed Property Act may, depending on the circumstances, apply to monetary payments collected by the Commissioner of Insurance from regulated persons and businesses for failure to comply with insurance statutes. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter Kolbe, General Counsel, North Carolina Department of Insurance, 2000 N.C. AG LEXIS 31 (2/9/2000).

§ 116B-52.
Definitions.

In this Chapter:

“Apparent owner” means a person whose name appears on the records of a holder as the person entitled to property held, issued, or owing by the holder.

“Business association” means a corporation, joint stock company, investment company, partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, limited liability company, business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, insurance company, mutual fund, utility, or other business entity consisting of one or more persons, whether or not for profit.

“Domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of a holder other than a corporation.

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, building and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank, bank, banking organization, or credit union.

“Holder” means a person obligated to hold for the account of or deliver or pay to the owner property that is subject to this Chapter.

“Insurance company” means an association, corporation, or fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, engaged in the business of providing life endowments, annuities, or insurance, including accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life, malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety, wage protection, and workers’ compensation insurance.

“Mineral” means gas, oil, coal, other gaseous, liquid, and solid hydrocarbons, oil shale, cement material, sand and gravel, road material, building stone, chemical raw material, gemstone, fissionable and nonfissionable ores, colloidal and other clay, steam and other geothermal resource, or any other substance defined as a mineral by the law of this State.

“Mineral proceeds” means amounts payable for the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, upon the abandonment of those payments, all payments that become payable thereafter. The term includes amounts payable:

For the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, royalties, compensatory royalties, shut-in royalties, minimum royalties, and delay rentals;

For the extraction, production, or sale of minerals, including net revenue interests, royalties, overriding royalties, extraction payments, and production payments; and

Under an agreement or option, including a joint operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling agreement, and farm-out agreement.

“Owner” means a person who has a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this Chapter or the person’s legal representative. The term includes a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in the case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, and a creditor, claimant, or payee in the case of other property.

“Person” means an individual, business association, financial organization, estate, trust, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Property” means (i) money or tangible personal property held by a holder that is physically located in a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository held by a financial institution within this State or (ii) a fixed and certain interest in intangible property or money that is held, issued, or owed in the course of a holder’s business, or by a government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, and all income or increments therefrom. The term includes property that is referred to as or evidenced by:

Money, a check, draft, deposit, interest, or dividend;

Credit balance, customer’s overpayment, gift certificate, security deposit, refund, credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket, mineral proceeds, or unidentified remittance;

Security or other evidence of ownership of an interest in a business association;

A bond, debenture, note, or other evidence of indebtedness;

Money deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons, or other securities, or to make distributions;

An amount due and payable under the terms of an annuity or insurance policy, including policies providing life insurance, property and casualty insurance, workers’ compensation insurance, or health and disability insurance; and

An amount distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance, or similar benefits.

(11a)

“Property finder” means an individual or business entity, incorporated or otherwise, who, for fee or any other consideration, seeks to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property that is distributable to the owner or presumed abandoned.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Treasurer” means the Treasurer of the State of North Carolina or the Treasurer’s designated agent.

“Utility” means a person who owns or operates for public use any plant, equipment, real property, franchise, or license for the transportation of the public, the transmission of communications, or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, or gas.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2011-230, s. 2; 2013-281, s. 2; 2017-134, s. 3; 2021-157, s. 2(d).

§ 116B-53.
Presumptions of abandonment.

Property is unclaimed if the apparent owner has not communicated in writing or by other means reflected in a contemporaneous record prepared by or on behalf of the holder, with the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held, and has not otherwise indicated an interest in the property. A communication with an owner by a person (other than the holder or its representative) who has not, in writing, identified the property to the owner is not an indication of interest in the property by the owner.

An indication of an interest in property includes:

The presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend or other distribution made with respect to an account or underlying security or other interest in a business association or, in the case of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, evidence that the distribution has been received;

The presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of interest made with respect to debt of a business association or, in the case of an interest payment made by electronic or similar means, evidence that the interest payment has been received;

Owner-directed activity in the account in which the property is held, including a direction by the owner to increase, decrease, or change the amount or type of property held in the account;

The making of a deposit to or withdrawal from an account in a financial organization;

Owner activity in another account with the holder of a deposit described in subdivisions (c)(2) and (c)(6) of this section; and

The payment of a premium with respect to a property interest in an insurance policy; but the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from maturing or terminating if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy has otherwise become entitled to the proceeds before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.

Property is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the time set forth below for the particular property:

Traveler’s check, 15 years after issuance.

Time deposit, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, 10 years after the later of initial maturity or the date of the last indication by the owner of interest in the property.

Money order, cashier’s check, teller’s check, and certified check, seven years after issuance.

A security or other equity interest in a business association, including a security entitlement under Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, three years after the earlier of:

The date of a cash dividend or other distribution unclaimed by the apparent owner.

The date a second consecutive mailing, notification, or communication from the holder to the apparent owner by first-class mail is returned to the holder as unclaimed by or undeliverable to the apparent owner.

The date the holder discontinued mailings, notifications, or communications to the apparent owner.This subdivision applies to both the underlying security, share, or other intangible ownership interest of an owner, and any security, share, or other intangible interest of which the business association is in possession of the certificate or other evidence or indicia of ownership, and to the security, share, or other ownership interest of dividend and nondividend paying business associations whether or not the interest is represented by a certificate.

Debt of a business association, including debt evidenced by a matured or called bearer bond or an original issue discount bond, three years after the date of an interest or principal payment unclaimed by the apparent owner.

(5a)

Any dividend, profit, distribution, interest, redemption, payment on principal, cash compensation (including amounts from a demutualized insurance company), or other sum held or owing by a business association for or to its shareholder, certificate holder, policyholder, member, bondholder, or other security holder, who has not claimed it, or corresponded in writing with the business association concerning it, within three years after the date prescribed for payment or delivery.

Demand or savings deposit, five years after the date of the last indication by the owner of interest in the property.

Money or credits owed to a customer as a result of a retail business transaction, three years after the obligation accrued.

Any gift certificate or electronic gift card bearing an expiration date and remaining unredeemed or dormant for more than three years after the gift certificate or electronic gift card was sold is deemed abandoned. The amount abandoned is deemed to be sixty percent (60%) of the unredeemed portion of the face value of the gift certificate or the electronic gift card.

Amount owed by an insurer on a life or endowment insurance policy or an annuity that has matured or terminated, three years after the obligation to pay arose or, in the case of a policy or annuity payable upon proof of death, three years after the insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based.

Property distributable by a business association in a course of dissolution, one year after the property becomes distributable.

Property received by a court as proceeds of a class action, and not distributed pursuant to the judgment, one year after the distribution date.

Property held by a court, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, one year after the property becomes distributable.

Wages or other compensation for personal services, one year after the compensation becomes payable.

Deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one year after the deposit or refund becomes payable.

Property in an individual retirement account, defined benefit plan, or other account or plan that is qualified for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States, three years after the earliest of the date of the distribution or attempted distribution of the property, the date of the required distribution as stated in the plan or trust agreement governing the plan, or the date, if determinable by the holder, specified in the income tax laws of the United States by which distribution of the property must begin in order to avoid a tax penalty.

All other property, five years after the owner’s right to demand the property or after the obligation to pay or distribute the property arises, whichever first occurs.

At the time that an interest in property is presumed abandoned under subsection (c) of this section, any other property right accrued or accruing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously presumed abandoned, is also presumed abandoned.

Property is payable or distributable for purposes of this Chapter notwithstanding the owner’s failure to make demand or present an instrument or document otherwise required to obtain payment or distribution, except as otherwise provided by the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2001-226, s. 1; 2005-132, s. 1; 2011-230, s. 3; 2017-134, s. 4.

Drafter’s Comment

The examples in subsection (b) of indications of interest in property are not exclusive. For example, notification of a change of the apparent owner’s address is an indication of interest.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-132, s. 1, effective June 30, 2005, in subsection (c)(4), in the introductory paragraph, substituted “three” for “five” and added subdivision (c)(4)c. and the concluding paragraph; in subdivision (c)(5), substituted “including debt evidenced by a matured or called” for “other than a” and “three” for “five,” and inserted “or principal”; added subdivision (c)(5a); and made minor punctuation changes through subsection (c).

Session Laws 2011-230, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011, substituted “one year” for “two years” in subdivision (c)(13).

Session Laws 2017-134, s. 4, effective July 20, 2017, substituted “security” for “stock” in subdivision (b)(1); in subdivision (c)(4), substituted “security” for “stock”; added “by first-class mail” in subdivision (c)(4)b; and substituted “security’ for ”stock“ in three places in subdivision (c)(4)c.

§ 116B-54.
Exclusion for forfeited reservation deposits, certain gift certificates or electronic gift cards, prepaid calling cards, certain manufactured home buyer deposits, certain credit balances, unclaimed lottery prizes, and certain merchandise credits.

A forfeited reservation deposit is not abandoned property. For the purposes of this section, the term “reservation deposit” means an amount of money paid to a business association to guarantee that the business association holds a specific service, such as a room accommodation at a hotel, seating at a restaurant, or an appointment with a doctor, for a specified date and place. The term “reservation deposit” does not include an application fee, a utility deposit, or a deposit made toward the purchase of real property.

A gift certificate or electronic gift card is not abandoned property when the gift certificate or electronic gift card:

Conspicuously states that the gift certificate or electronic gift card does not expire;

Bears no expiration date; or

States that a date of expiration printed on the gift certificate or electronic gift card is not applicable in North Carolina.

A prepaid calling card issued by a public utility as defined in G.S. 62-3(23)a.6. is not abandoned property.

A buyer deposit that a dealer is authorized to retain under either

G.S. 143-143.21

A or

G.S. 143-143.21

B is not abandoned property and is not subject to this Article.

Credit balances as shown on the records of a business association to or for the benefit of another business association, shall not constitute abandoned property. For purposes of this section, the term “credit balances” means items such as overpayments or underpayments on the sale of goods or services.

A lottery prize that remains unclaimed after the period set by the North Carolina State Lottery Commission for claiming those prizes shall not constitute abandoned property.

A card or certificate, whether paper, electronic, or other format, issued for a merchandise credit that meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section is not abandoned property under G.S. 116B-53(c)(7).

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2005-276, s. 31.1(w1); 2005-344, s. 7; 2015-218, s. 4.5(a).

§ 116B-54.1.
Unclaimed United States savings bonds.

U.S. Savings Bonds. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this Article apply to United States savings bonds. A United States savings bond is unclaimed and presumed abandoned if the owner of the savings bond fails to redeem the savings bond within three years after the savings bond has fully matured. The Treasurer may bring a civil action under this section to take all property rights and legal title and ownership of the savings bond or proceeds from the savings bond, including all rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner, or beneficiary. For purposes of this section, the term “savings bond” also includes United States savings notes, also known as Freedom Shares.

Civil Action. — Within 365 days after a United States savings bond is unclaimed and presumed abandoned under subsection (a) of this section, the Treasurer may commence a civil action in the Superior Court of Wake County for a determination that the savings bond escheats to the State of North Carolina. The Treasurer must make sufficient efforts to locate the owner of the savings bond before bringing an action under this section. The Treasurer may not bring an action under this section until a sufficient amount of United States savings bonds have accumulated owing to persons with a last known address of North Carolina to justify the expense of a proceeding under this section. The Treasurer may not bring an action under this section as to a specific savings bond if a claim has been filed for that savings bond in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

Title to the Savings Bond. — The court must enter a judgment that the United States savings bonds have escheated to the State of North Carolina and that all property rights and legal title to and ownership of the savings bonds or proceeds from the bonds, including all rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner, or beneficiary, vest solely in the State of North Carolina if all of the following conditions are met:

No person files a claim or appears at the hearing to substantiate a claim.

The court determines that a person who has filed a claim or appears at the hearing to substantiate a claim is not entitled to the property claimed by the claimant.

The court is satisfied by the evidence that the Treasurer has substantially complied with the laws of this State.

Claim for Escheated Savings Bond. — A person claiming ownership for a United States savings bond that has escheated to the State of North Carolina, or for the proceeds from a savings bond that has been redeemed by the Treasurer, may file a claim in accordance with the provisions of this Article. Upon providing sufficient proof of the validity of a person’s claim, the Treasurer may pay the claim.

Redemption of Savings Bond. — The Treasurer must take steps necessary to redeem any United States savings bond that has escheated to the State of North Carolina under this section. The proceeds from the redemption of the savings bond must be deposited in the Escheat Savings Bond Trust Fund, as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

Escheat Savings Bond Trust Fund. — The Escheat Savings Bond Trust Fund is established as a separately accounted fund within the Escheat Fund. The net proceeds from redemption of United States savings bonds must be credited to this Fund. The Escheat Savings Bond Trust Fund shall be treated as an endowment, and subject to the Treasurer withholding an amount necessary to accomplish the Treasurer’s duties as set out in this Chapter, its corpus may only be spent for purposes of investment and to pay funds to potential claimants. The interest and investment earnings on the Escheat Savings Bond Trust Fund shall be used exclusively to provide scholarships to worthy and needy students who are residents of this State and are enrolled in public institutions of higher education in this State.

History.

2014-93, s. 1.

§ 116B-55.
Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository.

Contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository held by a financial organization is presumed abandoned if the apparent owner has not claimed the property within the period established by

G.S. 53C-6-13

and shall be delivered to the Treasurer as provided by that section. If the contents include property described in

G.S. 116B-53

, the Treasurer shall hold the property for the remainder of the applicable period set forth in that section before the property is deemed to be received for purpose of sale under

G.S. 116B-65

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law in this Chapter or Chapter 53C of the General Statutes, the contents of a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository shall not be delivered to the Treasurer if the Treasurer determines any of the following:

The contents pose a potential public safety issue.

The contents are specifically regulated by another agency or authority.

The contents are illegal contraband.

The contents do not have substantial commercial value.

Each financial organization must complete, verify, and return a form prescribed by the Treasurer that provides identifying information for each item of property, including a good-faith estimated value. If the Treasurer determines that an item of property satisfies one or more of the factors listed in subsection (b) of this section, the Treasurer will either instruct the financial organization to place the property in the custody of the appropriate local, State or federal authority, or instruct the financial organization to destroy or otherwise dispose of the property. If property is delivered to the Treasurer and is later determined to satisfy one or more of the factors listed in subsection (b) of this section, the Treasurer shall deliver the property to the appropriate authority or instruct the appropriate authority to retrieve the property from the Treasurer or the Treasurer may destroy or otherwise store or dispose of the property.

None of the following shall be liable for any loss due to the disposal of any materials identified under subsection (b) of this section unless the loss is due to intentional misconduct:

The State, the Treasurer, or any officer, employee, or agent of the State or the Treasurer, acting in the person’s individual and official capacity.

A financial organization or any officer, employee, or agent of the financial organization.

History.

1999-460, s. 6; 2012-56, s. 46; 2015-68, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 46, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-6-13” for “G.S. 53-43.7.”

Session Laws 2015-68, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsections (b)-(d).

Legal Periodicals.

See 15 N.C.L. Rev. 350 (1937).

For comment on the 1949 amendment to the former escheat statute, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 427 (1949).

For comment on escheat of intangible property, see 2 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 100 (1966).

§ 116B-56.
Rules for taking custody.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter or by other statute of this State, property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this or another state, is subject to the custody of this State if:

The last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in this State;

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property, and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this State;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner and it is established that:

The last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this State; or

The holder is domiciled in this State or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this State and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property;

The last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, and the holder is domiciled in this State or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this State;

The last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a foreign country, and the holder is domiciled in this State or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this State; or

The property is a traveler’s check or money order purchased in this State or the issuer of the traveler’s check or money order has its principal place of business in this State and the issuer’s records show that the instrument was purchased in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or do not show the state in which the instrument was purchased.

In the case of an amount payable under the terms of an annuity or insurance policy, the last known address of the person entitled to the property is presumed to be the same as the last known address of the insured or the principal, as shown on the records of the insurance company, if:

A person other than the insured or the principal is entitled to the property; and

Either:

No address of the person is known to the insurance company; or

The records of the insurance company do not reflect the identity of the person.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-57.
Dormancy charge; other lawful charges.

A holder may deduct from property presumed abandoned a reasonable charge imposed by reason of the owner’s failure to claim the property within a specified time only if there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner under which the holder may impose the charge and the holder regularly imposes the charge, which is not regularly reversed or otherwise canceled.

This Chapter does not prevent a holder from deducting from property presumed abandoned other lawful charges specifically authorized by statute or by a valid and enforceable contract.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-58.
Burden of proof as to property evidenced by record of check or draft.

A record of the issuance of a check, draft, or similar instrument is prima facie evidence of an obligation. In claiming property from a holder who is also the issuer, the Treasurer’s burden of proof as to the existence and amount of the property and its abandonment is satisfied by showing issuance of the instrument and passage of the requisite period of abandonment. Defenses of payment, satisfaction, discharge, and want of consideration are affirmative defenses that must be established by the holder. In asserting these affirmative defenses, a holder who is also the issuer may satisfy the holder’s burden of proof by showing a written acknowledgement by the payee of a check, draft, or similar instrument that no obligation is owed the payee.

History.

1999-460, s. 6.

§ 116B-59.
Notice by holders to apparent owners.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-134, s. 2(a), effective October 1, 2017, and applicable to property presumed abandoned on or after that date.

(a1)

A holder of property that is presumed abandoned and that is either (i) a security or other equity interest in a business association, including a security entitlement under Article 8 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, that is valued at twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or more or (ii) property, other than a security or other equity interest in a business association, including a security entitlement under Article 8 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, that is valued at fifty dollars ($50.00) or more shall send written notice by first-class mail to the apparent owner not more than 120 days or less than 60 days before filing the report required by

G.S. 116B-60

. The holder shall exercise reasonable care to ascertain that it is sending the written notice to the apparent owner’s correct address.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-134, s. 2(a), effective October 1, 2017, and applicable to property presumed abandoned on or after that date.

The written notice to apparent owners required under this section must contain all of the following:

A statement that, according to the records of the holder, property is being held to which the addressee appears entitled and the amount or description of the property.

The name, address, and contact information of the person holding the property and any necessary information regarding changes of name and address of the holder.

A statement that, if satisfactory proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the holder by the following October 1 or, if the holder is an insurance company, by the following April 1, the property will be placed in the custody of the Treasurer, to whom all further claims shall be directed.

A statement that, once property is placed in the custody of the Treasurer, all interest, dividends, income, and gains earned on the property will remain with the Treasurer, even if the owner subsequently reclaims the property from the Treasurer.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 531, ss. 4-6; 1993, c. 539, s. 898; c. 541, s. 5; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-460, s. 6; 2017-134, s. 2(a).

§ 116B-60.
Report of abandoned property; certification by holders with tax return.

A holder of property presumed abandoned shall file a report in an electronic format prescribed by the Treasurer concerning the property. Holders shall file an electronic certification and verification in order to comply with subsection (f) of this section.

For amounts due to the apparent owner of property of the value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more, the report must be verified and must contain the following, if known by the holder:

Except with respect to a traveler’s check or money order, full name, last known address, social security number or taxpayer identification number, date of birth, drivers license or state identification number, and e-mail address of each person who, from the records of the holder of the property, appears to be the apparent owner of the property.

A description of the property, the identification number, if any, and the property amount.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-230, s. 4, effective October 1, 2011.

In the case of an amount held or owing under an annuity or a life or endowment insurance policy, the full name and last known address, social security number or taxpayer identification number, date of birth, drivers license or state identification number, and e-mail address of the annuitant or insured and of the beneficiary.

The date, if any, on which the property became payable, demandable, or returnable, and the date of the last transaction or communication with the apparent owner with respect to the property.

Other information that the Treasurer by rule prescribes as necessary for the administration of this Chapter.

(b1)

With the exception of property subject to G.S. 116B-53(c)(4), 116B-53(c)(5), and 116B-53(c)(5a), amounts due an apparent owner less than fifty dollars ($50.00) may be reported in an aggregate amount without furnishing any of the information required by subsection (b) of this section.

If a holder of property presumed abandoned is a successor to another person who previously held the property for the apparent owner or the holder has changed its name while holding the property, the holder shall file with the report its former names, if any, and the known names and addresses of all previous holders of the property.

The report must be filed before November 1 of each year and cover the 12 months next preceding July 1 of that year, but a report with respect to a life insurance company must be filed before May 1 of each year for the calendar year next preceding.

Before the date for filing the report, the holder of property presumed abandoned may request the Treasurer to extend the time for filing the report. The Treasurer may grant the extension for good cause. The holder, upon receipt of the extension, may make an interim payment on the amount the holder estimates will ultimately be due, which terminates the accrual of additional interest on the amount paid.

The holder of property presumed abandoned shall file with the report a certification and verification that the holder has complied with

G.S. 116B-59

.

(f1)

Any holder who has intangible property due to be reported with a cumulative value of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) or less in a single reporting year shall not be required to report the property in that year but shall report the property in any year when the value or aggregate value exceeds two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).

Every business association holding property presumed abandoned under this Chapter shall certify the holding in the income tax return required by Chapter 105 of the General Statutes. The certification shall be a part of the tax return with which it is filed. If the business association is not required to file an income tax return under Chapter 105, the certification shall be made in the form and manner required by the Secretary of Revenue. The information appearing on the certification is not privileged or confidential, and this information shall be furnished by the Secretary of Revenue to the Escheat Fund on October 1 of each year, or if this date shall fall on a weekend or holiday, on the next regular business day.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 531, ss. 7, 8; 1983, c. 204, s. 3; 1985, c. 215, ss. 2, 3; 1987, c. 163, ss. 1-3; 1993, c. 541, s. 6; 1999-460, s. 6; 2009-177, s. 1; 2011-230, s. 4; 2013-281, s. 3; 2020-48, ss. 3.5(a), 3.6.

§ 116B-61.
Payment or delivery of abandoned property.

Upon filing the report required by

G.S. 116B-60

, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall pay, deliver, or cause to be paid or delivered to the Treasurer the property described in the report, but if the property is an automatically renewable deposit, and a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result, the time for compliance is extended to the next filing and delivery date at which a penalty or forfeiture would no longer result.

If the property reported to the Treasurer is a security or security entitlement under Article 8 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, the Treasurer is an appropriate person to make an indorsement, instruction, or entitlement order on behalf of the apparent owner to invoke the duty of the issuer or its transfer agent or the securities intermediary to transfer or dispose of the security or the security entitlement in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes.

If the holder of property reported to the Treasurer is the issuer of a certificated security, the Treasurer has the right to obtain a replacement certificate pursuant to

G.S. 25-8-405

, but an indemnity bond is not required.

An issuer, the holder, and any transfer agent or other person acting pursuant to the instructions of and on behalf of the issuer or holder in accordance with this section is not liable to the apparent owner and must be indemnified against claims of any person in accordance with

G.S. 116B-63

.

History.

1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 1; 1981, c. 531, s. 14; 1987, c. 163, s. 6; 1993, c. 541, s. 7; 1999-460, s. 6.